Hawaii, session 2026, SB196.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part III, subpart F, to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-     Epinephrine administration.  (a) Each public school shall have available staff who are trained in the administration of, and authorized to administer, epinephrine.  The minimum number of trained and authorized staff members shall be the greater of one trained staff member per: (1)  One hundred students; or (2)  Floor of each school building to which students have access. (b)  Each public school shall prominently display in school buildings clearly legible signs stating the symptoms of anaphylaxis and the proper method for administering epinephrine. (c)  The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to implement this section." SECTION 2. Chapter 302D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302D-     Epinephrine administration.  (a) Each public charter school shall have available staff who are trained in the administration of, and authorized to administer, epinephrine.  The minimum number of trained and authorized staff members shall be the greater of one trained staff member per: (1)  One hundred students; or (2)  Floor of each school building to which students have access. (b)  Each public charter school shall prominently display in school buildings clearly legible signs stating the symptoms of anaphylaxis and the proper method for administering epinephrine. (c)  The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to implement this section." SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $          or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for training public school and public charter school staff members in the administration of epinephrine. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________